Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-250
Pupils; health inspections; when required.

During each school year the school district shall provide
the inspections required by section 79-248 for the children then in attendance.
As children enter school during the year, such inspections shall be confirmed upon their entrance.

Laws 1919, c. 241, § 3, p. 1004;

C.S.1922, § 6538;

C.S.1929, § 79-2115;

R.S.1943, § 79-2124;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 173, p. 749;

Laws 1967, c. 538, § 3, p. 1778;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,135;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 54;

Laws 2010, LB713, § 3.
July 15, 2010